.history/data/liheci_mini_20251209131048.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    +Lemma +VTypeA +Head +Tail +WHOLE

LEXICON Root

! lemma: 谈恋爱 （整词）
谈恋爱 : 谈恋爱+Lemma+VTypeA+WHOLE #;

! 也允许从 Root 直接走去 Head / Tail 词库
0:0 Liheci_Head;
0:0 Liheci_Tail;

LEXICON Liheci_Head
谈 : 谈+Head #;

LEXICON Liheci_Tail
恋爱 : 恋爱+Tail #;
0:0 #;

END
